test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kwwr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kȭr: # Noun 125 'eng /est ratas/fin' - full paradigm
     kȭr+N+Sg+Nom: kȭr
     kȭr+N+Sg+Gen: kȭr
     kȭr+N+Sg+Par: kȭrõ
     kȭr+N+Sg+Dat: kȭrõn
     kȭr+N+Sg+Ins: kȭrõks
     kȭr+N+Sg+Ill: kȭrõ
     kȭr+N+Sg+Ela: kȭrstõ
     kȭr+N+Pl+Nom: kȭrõd
     kȭr+N+Pl+Gen: kȭrõd
     kȭr+N+Pl+Par: kȭridi
     kȭr+N+Pl+Dat: kȭrõdõn
     kȭr+N+Pl+Ins: kȭrõdõks
     kȭr+N+Pl+Ill: kȭriž
     kȭr+N+Pl+Ela: kȭrist
